Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 21. Lien for Services

38-21-101.
Persons entitled to special lien.

Every person who, while lawfully in possession of an article of personal property, renders any service to the owner of such property, by labor or skill, has a special lien thereon, dependent on possession, for the compensation, if any, which is due from the owner for such service. Every laundry proprietor, person conducting a laundry business, dry cleaning establishment proprietor, and person conducting a dry cleaning establishment has a general lien, dependent on possession, upon all personal property in such person’s possession belonging to a customer, for the balance due from such customer for laundry work and for the balance due from such customer for dry cleaning work, but nothing in this section shall be construed to confer a lien in favor of a wholesale dry cleaner on materials received from a dry cleaning establishment proprietor or a person conducting a dry cleaning establishment. The terms “person” and “proprietor”, as used in this article, include an individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, and company.

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 648, § 1.

CSA:

C. § 101, § 14(1).

CRS 53:

§ 86-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-2-1.

L. 94:

Entire article amended, p. 461, § 1, effective March 31.

38-21-102.
Lienor may sell or dispose.

Any garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or any other items that remain in the possession of a person, on which cleaning, pressing, glazing, laundering, or washing has been done, alterations or repairs have been made, or materials or supplies have been used or furnished, for a period of ninety days or more after the completion of such services or labor may be sold. The person to whom such charges are payable and owing shall first notify the owner of such property of the time and place of such sale pursuant to section 38-21-104. Property that is to be placed in storage after any of the services or labor mentioned in this section shall not be affected by the provisions of this section.

If any garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or any other items are left with a launderer or retail dry cleaner for laundering or dry cleaning and are not reclaimed by the customer within one hundred eighty days, the launderer or dry cleaner may, without any liability or responsibility for such garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or any other items and without notification to the customer, dispose of such items in any manner suitable to the launderer or dry cleaner.

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 648, § 2.

CSA:

C. § 101, § 14(2).

CRS 53:

§ 86-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-2-2.

L. 94:

Entire article amended, p. 461, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 153, § 1, effective April 7.

38-21-103.
Sale for storage charges - disposal.

All garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, and any other items on which any of the services or labor mentioned in section 38-21-102 have been performed and then placed in storage by agreement, remaining in the possession of a person without the reasonable or agreed charges having been paid for a period of ninety days, may be sold. The person to whom the charges are payable and owing shall first notify the owner of such property of the time and place of sale pursuant to section 38-21-104. Persons operating as warehouses or warehousemen shall not be affected by this section.

If any garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or any other items are left for laundering or dry cleaning and placed in storage without the reasonable or agreed charges having been paid and are not reclaimed by the customer within one hundred eighty days, the person holding such property may, without any liability or responsibility for such garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or any other items and without notification to the customer, dispose of such items in any manner it deems suitable.

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 648, § 2.

CSA:

C. § 101, § 14(2).

CRS 53:

§ 86-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-2-3.

L. 94:

Entire article amended, p. 462, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 153, § 2, effective April 7.

38-21-104.
How notice given.

The notice required in this article shall be satisfied by mailing a registered letter, with a return address marked thereon, addressed to the owner of the property if an address was given at the time of delivery of the property, stating that the garments, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or any other items on which any of the services or labor mentioned in section 38-21-102 have been performed shall be sold unless they are reclaimed within thirty days after the date of the notice. The notice shall also include the time and place of the sale. The cost of posting or mailing said letter shall be added to the charges.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 94, p. 462, § 1, effective March 31, 1994.)

Whether or not an address was given at the time of delivery of the property, the person holding such property may dispose of any item after one hundred eighty days without notice pursuant to the provisions of section 38-21-102 (2) or section 38-21-103 (2).

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 648, § 2.

CSA:

C. § 101, § 14(2).

CRS 53:

§ 86-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-2-4.

L. 94:

Entire article amended, p. 462, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (3) added, p. 154, § 3, effective April 7.

38-21-105.
Disposition of proceeds of sale. (Deleted by amendment)

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 648, § 2.

CSA:

C. § 101, § 14(2).

CRS 53:

§ 86-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-2-5.

L. 94:

Entire article amended, p. 463, § 1, effective March 31.

38-21-106.
Notice posted in receiving office.

Each person taking advantage of this article must keep posted in a prominent place in such person’s receiving office at all times a notice which shall read as follows:

“All articles cleaned, pressed, glazed, laundered, washed, altered, or repaired and not reclaimed within ninety days may be sold, and such items may be disposed of after one hundred eighty days.”

History.

Source:
L. 47:

P. 648, § 2.

CSA:

C. § 101, § 14(2).

CRS 53:

§ 86-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-2-6.

L. 94:

Entire article amended, p. 463, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 154, § 4, effective April 7.